en: Ocean tested
fr: Testé en mer

en: Sensitive skin
bg: Чувствителна кожа
cs: Citlivá pokožka
da: Følsom hud
de: Empfindliche Haut
es: Piel sensible
fi: Herkkä iho
fr: Peaux sensibles
it: Pelle sensibile
ja: 敏感肌
ko: 민감한 피부
nl: Gevoelige huid
pt: Pele sensível

en: 1% for the planet, 1 percent for the planet, one percent for the planet
es: 1% para el planeta
fr: 1% pour la planète

en: 100% natural
da: 100% naturlig
de: 100% natürlich
es: 100% natural
fi: 100% luonnollinen
fr: 100% naturel
it: 100% naturale
nl: 100% natuurlijk
pt: 100% natural
sv: 100% naturlig

en: Without PEG
de: Ohne PEG
es: Sin PEG
fr: Sans PEG
it: Senza PEG
ja: PEG不使用
ko: PEG 없음
nl: Zonder PEG
pt: Sem PEG

en: Without PPD
de: Ohne PPD
es: Sin PPD
fr: Sans PPD
it: Senza PPD
ja: PPD不使用
ko: PPD 없음
nl: Zonder PPD
pt: Sem PPD

en: Without propellant gas
fr: Sans gaz propulseur
it: Senza gas propellente
ja: 推進ガス不使用
ko: 추진 가스 없음
nl: Zonder drijfgas
pt: Sem gás propelente

en: Without butane
bg: Без бутан
cs: Bez butanu
da: Uden butan
de: Ohne Butan
es: Sin butano
fi: Ilman butaania
fr: Sans butane
it: Senza butano
ja: ブタン不使用
ko: 부탄 없음
nl: Zonder butaan
pt: Sem butano

en: Without propane
fr: Sans propane
it: Senza propano
ja: プロパン不使用
ko: 프로판 없음
nl: Zonder propaan
pt: Sem propano

en: Without isobutane
bg: Без изобутан
cs: Bez isobutanu
da: Uden isobutan
de: Ohne Isobutan
es: Sin isobutano
fr: Sans isobutane
it: Senza isobutano
ja: イソブタン不使用
ko: 이소부탄 없음
nl: Zonder isobutaan
pt: Sem isobutano

en: Without camphor
de: Ohne Kampfer
es: Sin alcanfor
fr: Sans camphre
it: Senza canfora
ja: カンフル不使用
ko: 캠퍼 없음
nl: Zonder kamfer
pt: Sem cânfora

en: Without synthetic camphor
de: Ohne synthetischen Kampfer
es: Sin alcanfor sintético
fr: Sans camphre synthetique
it: Senza canfora sintetica
ja: 合成樟脳不使用
ko: 합성 장뇌 없음
nl: Zonder synthetische kamfer
pt: Sem cânfora sintética

en: Without rinsing
ar: بدون شطف
bg: Без изплакване
cs: Bez oplachování
da: Uden skylning
de: Ohne Ausspülen
el: Χωρίς ξέβγαλμα
es: Sin enjuague, Sin aclarado
fi: Ilman huuhtelua
fr: sans rinçage
he: ללא שטיפה
hu: Öblítés nélkül
id: Tanpa pembilasan
it: Senza risciacquo
ja: すすがない, すすぎ不要
ko: 헹구지 않음, 헹굼 없음
nl: Zonder naspoelen, Zonder uitspoelen
no: Uten skylling
pl: Bez płukania
pt: Sem enxágue
ro: Fără clătire
ru: Без смывания
sk: Bez oplachovania
sv: Utan sköljning
th: ไม่ต้องล้างออก
tr: Durulamadan
uk: Без змивання
vi: Không cần rửa
zh: 无需冲洗, 無需沖洗

en: Without sodium laureth sulfate
bg: Без натриев лаурет сулфат
cs: Bez sodného laurethsulfátu
da: Uden natriumlaurethsulfat
de: Ohne Natriumlaurethsulfat
es: Sin sulfato de laureth de sodio
fi: Ilman natriumlaurethsulfaattia
fr: sans sodium-laureth-sulfate, sans sodium-lauryl-laureth-sulfate, sans sodium-laureth-sulfates

en: Without titanium dioxide
de: Ohne Titandioxid
es: Sin dióxido de titanio
fr: Sans dioxyde de titane
it: Senza biossido di titanio
ja: 酸化チタン不使用
ko: 이산화 티타늄 없음
nl: Zonder titaniumdioxide
pt: Sem dióxido de titânio

en: Without toluene
de: Ohne Toluol
es: Sin tolueno
fr: Sans toluene
it: Senza toluene
ja: トルエン不使用
ko: 톨루엔 없음
nl: Zonder tolueen
pt: Sem tolueno

en: Without methylisothiazolinone
bg: Без метилизотиазолинона
cs: Bez methylisothiazolinonu
da: Uden methylisothiazolinon
de: Ohne Methylisothiazolinon
es: Sin metilisotiazolinona
fr: Sans methylisothiazolinone
it: Senza metilisotiazolinone
nl: Zonder methylisothiazolinon
pt: Sem metilisotiazolinona
ru: Без метилизотиазолинона

en: Without aluminum chlorohydrate
de: Ohne Aluminiumchlorhydrat
es: Sin clorohidrato de aluminio
fr: Sans aluminium chlorohydrate
it: Senza cloridrato di alluminio
nl: Zonder aluminiumchlorohydraat
pt: Sem cloridrato de alumínio

en: Without cotton
de: Ohne Baumwolle
es: Sin algodón
fi: Ilman puuvillaa
fr: Sans Coton
it: Senza cotone
nl: Zonder katoen
pt: Sem algodão

en: Without soda
fr: Sans soude